Colorado statutes. TITLE 23 Postsecondary Education
PART 1
COLORADO SCHOOL OF MINES

23-41-101. Location - powers.

The state school of mines, located at Golden in the county of Jefferson, is declared to be a body corporate under the name of "Colorado school of mines"; and, by that name, it may sue and be sued; may take and hold real and personal property by gift, bequest, devise, or purchase for the state; and may sell and dispose of the same when authorized so to do by law.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2427.

G.S.

§ 3098.

R.S. 08:

§ 6015.

C.L.

§ 8034.

CSA:

C. 145, § 1.

L. 37:

p. 1107, § 1.

CRS 53:

§ 124-9-1.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-9-1.

23-41-102. Board of trustees - term.

There is created a board of trustees of the Colorado school of mines to be composed of nine members. Seven members shall be appointed by the governor to terms of up to four years, expiring on December 31 of the third calendar year following the calendar year in which the member is appointed; except that the terms shall be staggered so that no more than four members' terms expire in the same year.

Of the seven members appointed by the governor, no more than four members may be affiliated with the same political party. In appointing members to the board of trustees, the governor shall ensure that no more than two of the members serving on the board of trustees at any one time reside outside the state of Colorado. In addition, the governor shall base the appointments on consideration of:

An appointee's professional background related to the industries and fields for which the Colorado school of mines prepares students for employment and in which the faculty of the institution conduct research;

Other areas of professional expertise that an appointee may bring to the appointee's service on the board of trustees; and

The appointee's commitment to using the appointee's personal time and efforts to serve and support the Colorado school of mines.

The two remaining member positions shall be filled by:

An elected member of the student body who is a full-time junior or senior student at the Colorado school of mines. The term of the elected student member's office is one year, beginning on July 1. The elected student member is advisory, without the right to vote. As used in this subsection (1), "full-time student" has the same definition as "full-time equivalent student" used by the joint budget committee of the general assembly.

A full-time member of the academic faculty of the Colorado school of mines elected by a majority of at least sixty-seven percent of the academic faculty. Elected faculty members serve two-year terms commencing January 1 of each odd-numbered year. The elected faculty member is advisory, without the right to vote.

Members shall hold their offices for the terms for which they have been appointed and until their successors are appointed and qualified. Any four of the members of the board appointed by the governor constitute a quorum for the transaction of business. The board has such powers and shall perform such duties as specified in the laws creating the institution and providing for its maintenance.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2022.)

Source:

G.L.

§ 2428.

G.S.

§ 3099.

R.S. 08:

§ 6016.

C.L.

§ 8035.

L. 35:

p. 1024, § 1.

CSA:

C. 145, § 2.

CRS 53:

§ 124-9-2.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-9-2.

L. 73:

p. 1327, § 1.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 739, § 4, effective January 1, 1976.

L. 87:

(1) amended, p. 909, § 17, effective June 15.

L. 94:

(1) amended, p. 488, § 1, effective March 31.

L. 2006:

(1)(a) amended, p. 1231, § 3, effective May 26.

L. 2008:

(1)(a) amended, p. 621, § 2, effective April 24.

L. 2010:

(3) added, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, p. 1859, § 39, effective June 9.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (SB 22-013), ch. 2, p. 36, § 46, effective February 25.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act amending subsection (1)(a), see section 1 of chapter 176, Session Laws of Colorado 2008. For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act adding subsection (3), see section 1 of chapter 391, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

23-41-103. Oath or affirmation of trustees.

Every trustee shall take an oath or affirmation in accordance with section 24-12-101.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2430.

G.S.

§ 3100.

R.S. 08:

§ 6017.

C.L.

§ 8036.

CSA:

C. 145, § 3.

CRS 53:

§ 124-9-3.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-9-3.

L. 2018:

Entire section amended, (HB 18-1138), ch. 88, p. 695, § 12, effective August 8.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 18-1138, see section 1 of chapter 88, Session Laws of Colorado 2018.

23-41-103.5. The Colorado school of mines fund - creation - control - use.

There is hereby created in the state treasury the Colorado school of mines fund which shall be under the control of and administered by the board of trustees of the Colorado school of mines in accordance with the provisions of this article. The board of trustees shall have authority and responsibility for all moneys of the board of trustees and of Colorado school of mines. The board of trustees shall designate, pursuant to its constitutional and statutory authority, those moneys received or acquired by the board of trustees or by the Colorado school of mines, whether by appropriation, grant, contract, or gift, by sale or lease of surplus real or personal property, or by any other means, whose disposition is not otherwise provided for by law, that shall be credited to the fund. All interest derived from the deposit and investment of moneys in the fund must be credited to the fund. The moneys in the fund are hereby continuously appropriated to the board of trustees and shall remain in the fund under the control of the board of trustees and shall not be transferred or revert to the general fund of the state at the end of any fiscal year.

The moneys in the Colorado school of mines fund shall be used by the board of trustees of the Colorado school of mines in carrying out its statutory powers and duties.

Moneys in the Colorado school of mines fund that are not needed for immediate use by the board of trustees of the Colorado school of mines may be invested by the state treasurer in investments authorized by sections 24-36-109, 24-36-112, and 24-36-113, C.R.S. The board of trustees shall determine the amount of moneys in the fund that may be invested and shall notify the state treasurer in writing of such amount.

If the board of trustees votes to invest Colorado school of mines assets pursuant to sections 23-41-103.6 and 23-41-103.7, the board shall establish an investment advisory committee consisting of at least five members to make recommendations to the board regarding investments. The investment advisory committee may include the treasurer of the board and up to three representatives from the financial community.

Source:

L. 2000:

Entire section added, p. 396, § 1, effective August 2.

L. 2013:

(1) amended and (4) added, (HB 13-1297), ch. 260, p. 1371, § 1, effective August 7.

23-41-103.6. Investments in consolidated funds.

Unless otherwise restrained by the terms of a will, trust agreement, or other instrument of gift, the board of trustees may hold investments in one or more consolidated investment funds in which the participating trusts or accounts have undivided interests. To the extent permitted by law, the board may also transfer money for investment in consolidated funds held by a related entity so long as the investments are separately accounted for.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1297), ch. 260, p. 1372, § 2, effective August 7.

23-41-103.7. Corporate stock in name of nominee authorized.

In order to facilitate the investment, reinvestment, sale, and disposition of corporate stocks, the board of trustees may hold certificates of stock in the name of a nominee of its selection without disclosing the fact that the certificates are held by the board of trustees or are held in a fiduciary capacity if:

The records of the board of trustees and all reports or accounts rendered by it clearly show the ownership of the stock by the board and the facts regarding the board's holding; and

The nominee deposits with the board of trustees a signed statement showing the trust ownership, endorses the stock certificate in blank, and does not have possession of or access to the stock certificate except under the immediate supervision of the treasurer of Colorado school of mines or another person that the board of trustees has designated.

The board of trustees shall maintain a list of certificates of stock held in the names of nominees pursuant to this section and shall make the list available for public inspection during normal business hours.

The board of trustees shall report to the joint budget committee of the general assembly at each regular session, beginning after August 7, 2013, regarding the investments made and the earnings or losses derived therefrom under the provisions of this section and section 23-41-103.6. The report must include information indicating the extent to which the investment managers hired by the board of trustees have achieved or failed to achieve the performance benchmarks established pursuant to section 23-41-103.8 (1)(b).

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1297), ch. 260, p. 1372, § 2, effective August 7.

23-41-103.8. Investment policy - fiduciary responsibility.

If the board of trustees votes to invest Colorado school of mines assets pursuant to sections 23-41-103.6 and 23-41-103.7, then the board of trustees shall develop and annually review a written investment policy for Colorado school of mines, which policy shall include:

An acknowledgment by the board of trustees of the board's fiduciary responsibility with respect to oversight of the investment policy of Colorado school of mines; and

The establishment of performance benchmarks for each investment manager hired by the board of trustees pursuant to sections 23-41-103.6 and 23-41-103.7.

If the board of trustees votes to invest moneys pursuant to sections 23-41-103.6 and 23-41-103.7, the board shall require annual financial statements to be submitted to the board of trustees, the state treasurer, the state auditor, and the joint budget committee of the general assembly. The financial statements must include, at a minimum, information concerning investment income, gains, and losses, if any, of Colorado school of mines. The financial statements must report the performance of investments on both a gross-of-fee and a net-of-fee basis.

If the board of trustees votes to invest moneys pursuant to sections 23-41-103.6 and 23-41-103.7, the board shall ensure that, at all times, liquid investment assets remain at a level sufficient to pay for all budgeted, outstanding operational obligations and expenses occurring within the current fiscal year.

Colorado school of mines shall not request from the general assembly any general fund appropriations to replace any losses incurred due to investment activities conducted by the board of trustees pursuant to sections 23-41-103.6 and 23-41-103.7.

Source:

L. 2013:

Entire section added, (HB 13-1297), ch. 260, p. 1372, § 2, effective August 7.

23-41-104. Control - management.

The board of trustees has the control and management of the Colorado school of mines and of the property belonging thereto, subject to the laws of this state, and may make all needful bylaws and regulations for the government of said board and for the management and government of the Colorado school of mines not inconsistent with the laws of this state.

The board of trustees may lease, for terms not exceeding eighty years, real or personal property, or both, to state or federal governmental agencies, persons, or entities, public or private, for the construction, use, operation, maintenance, and improvement of research and development facilities, health and recreation facilities, dormitories, and living, dining, and group housing buildings and facilities or for any of such purposes and to buy land and construct buildings and facilities therefor. Neither the grounds so leased nor any of the improvements constructed on the grounds shall be used in any manner that discriminates against anyone because of race, creed, color, religion, national origin, ancestry, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or gender expression. The board of trustees may borrow money in conjunction with the construction and leases and assist in effecting any of those purposes. Any actions taken prior to May 27, 1965, by the board of trustees consistent with any power granted in this subsection (2) are ratified and validated.

The board of trustees has the power to borrow funds, to issue securities and refunding securities, and to pledge income, fees, and revenues, as provided in sections 23-5-102 and 23-5-103. In addition to the purposes therein set forth, it may issue bonds, warrants, or certificates of indebtedness thereunder for constructing, purchasing, or otherwise acquiring, extending, and equipping research and development facilities and land for such purposes to be owned by the Colorado school of mines for the benefit of the Colorado school of mines or for the use of its students and employees. Research and development facilities and land acquired may also be used in part by such state or federal governmental agencies, persons, or entities, public or private, as may contract or enter into leases with the Colorado school of mines. Net income derived or anticipated to be derived from such facilities and land may be pledged, alone or with other sources, as authorized by section 23-5-103, to the payment of any securities or refunding securities issued pursuant to sections 23-5-102 and 23-5-103.

The board of trustees has the power to lease portions of the college grounds to private persons and corporations for the construction of research and development facilities, health and recreation facilities, dormitories, and living, dining, or group housing buildings and facilities and to rent, lease, maintain, operate, and purchase such buildings and facilities. In exercising the powers conferred on it by this subsection (4), the board of trustees is authorized to enter into agreements which establish fixed rental rates for the full term of any lease, to let individual rooms and quarters within leased buildings and facilities at such rental rates as are approved by the board and prescribed in the lease, and to enter into agreements not to alter such rates during the term of any lease agreement without the prior consent of the lessor or his assigns.

Nothing in subsections (2), (3), and (4) of this section shall constitute any authority to enter into any contract which in any way creates any debt or obligation upon the state on account of the construction of such buildings, improvements, or facilities.

The provisions of this section shall not affect the tax liability on property leased as authorized by this section or leasehold interest resulting therefrom of individuals or corporations which do not qualify for tax exemption pursuant to the provisions of sections 39-3-106 to 39-3-113.5 or 39-3-116, C.R.S.

Repealed.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2431.

G.S.

§ 3101.

R.S. 08:

§ 6018.

C.L.

§ 8037.

CSA:

C. 145, § 4.

CRS 53:

§ 124-9-4.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-9-4.

L. 65:

§ p. 1035, § 1.

L. 89:

(6) amended, p. 1482, § 2, effective April 23; (6) amended, p. 1492, § 7, effective June 7.

L. 99:

(7) repealed, p. 195, § 1, effective March 31.

L. 2008:

(2) amended, p. 1602, § 28, effective May 29.

L. 2013:

(6) amended, (HB 13-1300), ch. 316, p. 1680, § 45, effective August 7.

L. 2021:

(2) amended, (HB 21-1108), ch. 156, p. 894, § 29, effective September 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration contained in the 2008 act amending subsection (2), see section 1 of chapter 341, Session Laws of Colorado 2008. For the legislative declaration in HB 21-1108, see section 1 of chapter 156, Session Laws of Colorado 2021.

23-41-104.5. Hazardous waste remediation - report. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 94:

Entire section added, p. 1885, § 4, effective June 1.

Editor's note:

Subsection (2) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 1995. (See L. 94, p. 1885.)

23-41-104.6. Performance contract - authorization - operations.

The general assembly hereby finds that the Colorado school of mines is an exemplary institution of higher education that has demonstrated a high degree of responsibility and capability with regard to its academic and administrative functions as evidenced by the following:

The Colorado school of mines retains and graduates over sixty percent of the students who enroll in the institution;

The Colorado school of mines consistently demonstrates that at least ninety percent of its graduates are employed in a field that is relevant to the education they received at the institution and that the average starting salary of those graduates is in excess of the national average for engineering school graduates;

The Colorado school of mines continues to receive accreditation reviews from national accrediting organizations that raise no issues with the quality of the engineering programs offered at the institution;

Senior students at the Colorado school of mines consistently score above the national average on a standardized exam for engineering school students;

Over seventy-five percent of the undergraduate students at the Colorado school of mines receive some form of financial aid;

The Colorado school of mines has an endowment that places it among the top fifteen public institutions of higher education in the amount of endowment per student.

For the reasons specified in subsection (1) of this section, the general assembly hereby authorizes the Colorado school of mines to operate pursuant to a performance contract, as described in this section, with the department of higher education and the Colorado commission on higher education. The Colorado school of mines shall operate pursuant to a performance contract for the period specified in subsection (4) of this section.

The board of trustees of the Colorado school of mines shall negotiate and sign a performance contract with the department of higher education, subject to approval by the Colorado commission on higher education, that specifies the performance goals that the institution shall achieve during the period that it operates under the performance contract. The specified goals must be measurable and specific to the Colorado school of mines' role and mission and include provisions relating to master plan goals and may also include, but need not be limited to, the following issues:

Appropriate levels of student enrollment, transfer, retention, and graduation rates, and institutional programs specifically designed to assist students in achieving their academic goals;

Student satisfaction and student performance after graduation, including employment and enrollment in graduate programs;

Assessment of the quality of the institution's academic programs, including assessment by external reviewers such as accreditation boards and employers and consideration of student performance on national examinations;

Increasing financial support to sustain and enhance essential functions that are partially state funded, including:

Education, industrial, and federal research capabilities and competitiveness;

Student financial aid;

Capital construction; and

Technological advancements.

The performance contracts negotiated pursuant to this section shall not take effect until approved by a joint resolution adopted by the general assembly. The grounds for rejection of the performance contracts shall include the effect of the provisions of the contracts on the funding for the Colorado school of mines and funding for the statewide system of higher education.

As early as possible during the 2002 regular session and as early as possible during the 2013 regular session, the Colorado commission on higher education shall present the finalized performance contract for the applicable contract period at a joint session of the education committees of the senate and the house of representatives, or any successor committees, and the joint budget committee of the general assembly. The members of the education committees and the members of the joint budget committee shall review the financial effect of the provisions of the contract with regard to funding for the Colorado school of mines or funding for the statewide system of higher education and may recommend changes to the terms of the performance contract or renegotiation of the performance contract. If a majority of the members of the education committees and the members of the joint budget committee approve the terms of the performance contract, the chairmen of the education committees, in cooperation with the joint budget committee, shall sponsor a joint resolution to recognize and approve the performance contract. The performance contract shall be deemed approved upon final passage of said joint resolution.

The school of mines shall operate pursuant to the performance contract that is approved by joint resolution passed during the 2002 regular session beginning on the date the performance contract is approved and continuing through the date on which the governor signs the joint resolution passed during the 2013 regular legislative session that approves the next performance contract. The school of mines shall operate pursuant to the performance contract that is approved by joint resolution passed during the 2013 regular session beginning on the day after the date on which the governor signs the joint resolution and continuing through the date on which the governor signs the joint resolution passed during the 2023 regular legislative session that approves the next performance contract.

While operating pursuant to the performance contract negotiated pursuant to this section, the board of trustees of the Colorado school of mines:

Shall continue to operate as the governing board for the institution. In addition, the governor may appoint additional advisory members to the board to sustain and enhance the role and mission of the Colorado school of mines. Any additional members of the board of trustees shall serve as nonvoting members of the board and be representative of national and international industries and research and academic institutions. The role of any such advisory members shall be to improve the trustees' opportunities to develop and enrich the academic and research programs at the institution.

Need not consult with nor obtain approval from the Colorado commission on higher education to create, modify, or eliminate academic and vocational programs offered by the Colorado school of mines, so long as such creations, modifications, and eliminations are consistent with the institution's statutory role and mission;

Shall have sole authority to establish resident and nonresident tuition rates for the Colorado school of mines so long as the school continues to meet the goals specified in the performance contract and to comply with the provisions of section 23-41-104.7.
(c) (I) (A) Shall have sole authority to establish resident and nonresident tuition rates for the Colorado school of mines so long as the school continues to meet the goals specified in the performance contract and to comply with the provisions of section 23-41-104.7.

Notwithstanding any provision of sub-subparagraph (A) of this subparagraph (I) to the contrary, for fiscal years 2011-12 through 2015-16, the board of trustees shall have sole authority to establish resident and nonresident tuition rates for the Colorado school of mines; except that the annual percentage increase in resident tuition rates shall not exceed the greater of a percentage equal to two times the rate of the percentage change in the consumer price index for the Denver metropolitan area or, for fiscal years 2011-12 through 2013-14, nine percent, or, for fiscal years 2014-15 and 2015-16, six percent. For fiscal years 2011-12 through 2013-14, the Colorado commission on higher education may approve a greater tuition increase pursuant to section 23-5-130.5.

Repealed.

While operating pursuant to the performance contract negotiated pursuant to this section, the Colorado school of mines shall:

Remain eligible for state-funded capital construction projects and controlled maintenance projects as provided in section 23-1-106;

Continue to admit all Colorado resident applicants who meet the admissions criteria of the institution and shall provide equal educational opportunities to all students.

and (8) Repealed.

Source:

L. 2001:

Entire section added, p. 1309, § 1, effective June 5.

L. 2004:

(7)(b) added by revision, pp. 723, 724, §§ 14, 18.

L. 2007:

(5)(c)(II) and (8) repealed, p. 756, § 5, effective May 10.

L. 2010:

IP(3), (4), and (5)(c)(I) amended, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, pp. 1857, 1843, §§ 37, 11, effective June 9.

L. 2011:

(2), IP(3), (4)(b), and (4)(c) amended, (SB 11-052), ch. 232, p. 1000, § 9, effective May 27.

L. 2012:

IP(3), (4)(b), and (4)(c) amended, (HB 12-1155), ch. 255, p. 1280, § 7, effective August 8.

L. 2014:

(5)(c)(I)(B) amended, (SB 14-001), ch. 138, p. 475, § 4, effective May 1.

L. 2017:

IP(3) amended, (SB 17-297), ch. 210, p. 821, § 17, effective May 18.

23-41-104.7. Funding.

Beginning in the 2011-12 fiscal year, the Colorado school of mines shall use a portion of its fee-for-service funding negotiated pursuant to section 23-18-303.5 for the following purposes:

To provide merit-based scholarships, need-based financial aid, and graduate student support to assist students with in-state classification to attend the institution;

To provide services and programs designed to enhance student success, including but not limited to advising, counseling, academic support, and career services; and

To provide precollegiate programs and services designed to increase and broaden participation in science, technology, engineering, and math fields and enrollment at the Colorado school of mines.

The Colorado school of mines shall increase the portion of fee-for-service funding used to ensure that, no later than the 2020-21 fiscal year and for each fiscal year thereafter, all fee-for-service funding is used for the purposes set forth in subsection (1)(a) of this section, except as otherwise provided in subsection (2)(b) of this section.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (HB11-1074), ch. 61, p. 159, § 1, effective August 10, 2011.)

Beginning in 2020-21 and in any fiscal year thereafter in which the average discounted tuition rate for undergraduate students with in-state classification enrolled at the Colorado school of mines is greater than thirty percent, the institution may use any amount of fee-for-service funding that is not used to maintain the average discounted tuition rate at thirty percent for other operational purposes. As used in this paragraph (b), "average discounted tuition rate" means the total of the amount of merit-based and need-based scholarships and grants awarded from institution funds to undergraduate students with in-state classification enrolled in the institution divided by the total tuition revenue from undergraduate students with in-state classification.

(Deleted by amendment, L. 2011, (HB11-1074), ch. 61, p. 159, § 1, effective August 10, 2011.)

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, p. 1858, § 38, effective June 9.

L. 2011:

Entire section amended, (HB 11-1074), ch. 61, p. 159, § 1, effective August 10.

L. 2014:

(1) amended, (HB 14-1319), ch. 169, p. 614, § 14, effective May 9.

L. 2017:

(1) amended, (HB 17-1140), ch. 46, p. 137, § 1, effective August 9.

L. 2020:

IP(1)(a) amended, (HB 20-1366), ch. 181, p. 835, § 16, effective July 1, 2021.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act adding this section, see section 1 of chapter 391, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

23-41-105. School established - role and mission.

There is hereby established a school at Golden, to be known as the Colorado school of mines. The school of mines shall be a specialized baccalaureate and graduate research institution with high admission standards. The Colorado school of mines shall have a unique mission in energy, mineral, and material science and engineering and associated engineering and science fields. The school shall be the primary institution of higher education offering energy, mineral, and material science and mineral engineering degrees at both the graduate and undergraduate levels.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2432.

L. 1881:

p. 219, § 1.

G.S.

§ 3102.

R.S. 08:

§ 6019.

C.L.

§ 8038.

CSA:

C. 145, § 5.

CRS 53:

§ 124-9-5.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-9-5.

L. 85:

Entire section R&RE, p. 764, § 8, effective July 1.

23-41-106. May procure machinery.

The board of trustees is authorized to procure such machinery and other appliances and make such necessary additions to the Colorado school of mines buildings as may be necessary to carry out the object and intention of such institution and to promote the welfare thereof whenever the funds provided for the support of said school will warrant the same.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2433.

G.S.

§ 3103.

R.S. 08:

§ 6020.

C.L.

§ 8039.

CSA:

C. 145, § 6.

CRS 53:

§ 124-9-6.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-9-6.

23-41-107. Tuition - school open to all.

The Colorado school of mines is open for instruction to all bona fide residents of this state, without regard to sex or color, upon the payment of such reasonable tuition fees as may be prescribed by the board of trustees pursuant to section 23-41-104.6. With the consent of such board, students from other states, territories, or countries may receive education thereat upon such terms and at such rates of tuition as such board may determine.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2434.

G.S.

§ 3104.

R.S. 08:

§ 6021.

C.L.

§ 8040.

L. 33:

p. 852, § 1.

CSA:

C. 145, § 7.

CRS 53:

§ 124-9-7.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-9-7.

L. 70:

p. 357, § 12.

L. 93:

Entire section amended, p. 1519, § 27, effective June 6.

L. 2008:

Entire section amended, p. 119, § 5, effective March 19.

L. 2010:

Entire section amended, (SB 10-003), ch. 391, p. 1843, § 12, effective June 9.

Cross references:

(1) For classification of students for tuition purposes, see article 7 of this title.

(2) For the legislative declaration in the 2010 act amending this section, see section 1 of chapter 391, Session Laws of Colorado 2010.

23-41-108. Officers - meeting of board.

The board, at its first meeting and biennially thereafter, shall elect one of its number president of said board, and shall also appoint a secretary and a treasurer, either from its own number or other suitable persons as it may deem best, and prescribe their duties, and, at any time in its discretion, may remove such secretary or treasurer. The meetings of said board shall be held at Golden, Jefferson county, Colorado; except that, when the work of the board so requires in its discretion, it may hold meetings at any other place in the state of Colorado.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2435.

G.S.

§ 3105.

R.S. 08:

§ 6022.

C.L.

§ 8041.

L. 35:

p. 1026, § 1.

CSA:

C. 145, § 8.

CRS 53:

§ 124-9-8.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-9-8.

23-41-109. Vacancies.

The governor of this state, with the advice and consent of the senate, at each regular session of the general assembly, shall fill, by appointment, all vacancies in offices of members of said board of trustees appointed by the governor occurring either by expiration of their terms of office or otherwise. Any vacancy in an office of a member of such board appointed by the governor which occurs when the general assembly is not in session may be temporarily filled by the governor until the next meeting of the general assembly, but, at all times, at least one appointed member of said board of trustees shall be a graduate of the Colorado school of mines upon whom a degree has been conferred by its board of trustees not less than ten years prior to his appointment.

Commencing with appointments made by the governor in 1977, and at all times thereafter, at least four and not more than five of the appointed members of the board shall be graduates of the Colorado school of mines upon each of whom a degree has been conferred by its board of trustees not less than ten years prior to his appointment.

Any vacancy in the elected office on the board shall be filled by reelection for the unexpired term.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2436.

G.S.

§ 3106.

R.S. 08:

§ 6023.

L. 09:

p. 501, § 1.

C.L.

§ 8042.

CSA:

C. 145, § 9.

CRS 53:

§ 124-9-9.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-9-9.

L. 75:

Entire section amended, p. 739, § 5, effective January 1, 1976.

L. 81:

(1) amended, p. 2027, § 28, effective July 14.

23-41-110. Treasurer's bond.

The board of trustees shall require its treasurer to give such bond as it deems sufficient to protect said institution against loss of any funds which may come into his hands as such treasurer, conditioned for the safekeeping and faithful disbursement thereof. The treasurer of said board shall not pay out any of the funds which shall come into his hands as treasurer, except upon the order of the president of said board countersigned by the secretary thereof.

Source:

L. 1883:

p. 275, § 3.

G.S.

§ 3112.

R.S. 08:

§ 6029.

C.L.

§ 8051.

CSA:

C. 145, § 18.

CRS 53:

§ 124-9-17.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-9-10.

23-41-111. Assays and analyses.

The president of the faculty of the school of mines, or professor in charge thereof, who shall be appointed by said board of trustees, shall be known as president of the Colorado school of mines. It is lawful for said president to make or have made by any member of the faculty or by students, for residents of Colorado only, assays and analyses of Colorado ores and minerals and to make reports of such results free of charge upon blanks printed for that purpose, which shall, in a conspicuous place, have printed thereon: "The following is the assay or analysis of sample received from .............., and is not to be used in any way for promotion purposes."

Source:

G.L.

§ 2443.

L. 1883:

p. 276, § 4.

G.S.

§ 3113.

R.S. 08:

§ 6030.

L. 13:

p. 577, § 1.

C.L.

§ 8052.

CSA:

C. 145, § 19.

CRS 53:

§ 124-9-18.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-9-11.

23-41-112. Transfer of property.

All property, both real and personal, belonging to the Colorado school of mines, shall be vested in the trustees, in trust for the use and benefit of the state of Colorado.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2444.

G.S.

§ 3114.

R.S. 08:

§ 6031.

C.L.

§ 8053.

CSA:

C. 145, § 20.

CRS 53:

§ 124-9-19.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-9-12.

23-41-113. Fund used exclusively for school.

The school of mines fund shall be used solely for the support of the Colorado school of mines and for no other purpose, notwithstanding any provision in the law to establish the office of commissioner of mines.

Source:

G.L.

§ 2445.

G.S.

§ 3115.

R.S. 08:

§ 6032.

C.L.

§ 8054.

CSA:

C. 145, § 21.

CRS 53:

§ 124-9-20.

C.R.S. 1963:

§ 124-9-13.